test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-aswq25_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:



# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct.


  Noun - asõq: # Noun (25) asõq 'eng /est /fin' - full paradigm
     asõq+N+Sg+Nom: [asõ, asõq]
     asõq+N+Sg+Gen: [asõmõ, asõma]
     asõq+N+Sg+Par: asõnd
     asõq+N+Sg+Ill: [asõmõhe, asõmahe, asõmõdõ, asõmadõ]
     asõq+N+Sg+Ine: [asõmõn, asõman, asõmõh, asõmah, asõmõhn, asõmahn]
     asõq+N+Sg+Ela: [asõmõst, asõmast]
     asõq+N+Sg+All: [asõmõlõ, asõmalõ]
     asõq+N+Sg+Ade: [asõmõl, asõmal]
     asõq+N+Sg+Abl: [asõmõlt, asõmalt]
     asõq+N+Sg+Tra: [asõmõs, asõmas]
     asõq+N+Sg+Ter: [asõmõniq, asõmaniq]
     asõq+N+Sg+Abe: [asõmõldaq, asõmaldaq]
     asõq+N+Sg+Com: [asõmõgaq, asõmagaq]
     asõq+N+Pl+Nom: [asõmõq, asõmaq]
     asõq+N+Pl+Gen: [asõmidõ, asõmiidõ]
     asõq+N+Pl+Par: [asõmit, asõmiid]
     asõq+N+Pl+Ill: [asõmihe, asõmiihe, asõndõhe, asõmidõ, asõmiidõ, asõndõdõ]
     asõq+N+Pl+Ine: [asõmin, asõmih, asõmihn, asõmiin, asõmiih, asõmiihn, asõndõn, asõndõh, asõndõhn]
     asõq+N+Pl+Ela: [asõmist, asõmiist, asõndõst]
     asõq+N+Pl+All: [asõmilõ, asõmiilõ, asõndõlõ]
     asõq+N+Pl+Ade: [asõmil, asõmiil, asõndõl]
     asõq+N+Pl+Abl: [asõmilt, asõmiilt, asõndõlt]
     asõq+N+Pl+Tra: [asõmis, asõmiis, asõndõs]
     asõq+N+Pl+Ter: [asõminiq, asõmiiniq, asõndõniq]
     asõq+N+Pl+Abe: [asõmildaq, asõmiildaq, asõndõldaq]
     asõq+N+Pl+Com: [asõmidõgaq, asõmiidõgaq, asõndõgaq]
